Hawaii statutes.
§709-908 Tobacco and electronic smoking
devices prohibited; minors. [Section effective until December 31,
2015. For section effective January 1, 2016, see below.] (1) It shall be
unlawful to sell or furnish tobacco in any shape or form, including chewing
tobacco and snuff, or an electronic smoking device to a minor under eighteen
years of age.

(2) Signs using the statement, "The sale
of tobacco products or electronic smoking devices to persons under eighteen is
prohibited", shall be posted on or near any vending machine in letters at
least one-half inch high and at or near the point of sale of any other location
where tobacco products or electronic smoking devices are sold in letters at
least one-half inch high.

(3) It shall be unlawful for a minor under
eighteen years of age to purchase any tobacco product, as described under
subsection (1), or an electronic smoking device, as described under subsection
(5). This provision does not apply if a person under the age of eighteen, with
parental authorization, is participating in a controlled purchase as part of a
law enforcement activity or a study authorized by the department of health
under the supervision of law enforcement to determine the level of incidence of
tobacco or electronic smoking devices sales to minors.

(4) Any person who violates subsection (1) or
(2), or both, shall be fined $500 for the first offense. Any subsequent
offenses shall subject the person to a fine not less than $500 nor more than
$2,000. Any minor under eighteen years of age who violates subsection (3)
shall be fined $10 for the first offense. Any subsequent offense shall subject
the violator to a fine of $50, no part of which shall be suspended, or the
person shall be required to perform not less than forty-eight hours nor more
than seventy-two hours of community service during hours when the person is not
employed and is not attending school.

(5) For the purposes of this section:

"Electronic smoking device" means any
electronic product that can be used to simulate smoking in the delivery of
nicotine or other substances to the person inhaling from the device, including
but not limited to an electronic cigarette, electronic cigar, electronic
cigarillo, or electronic pipe, and any cartridge or other component of the device
or related product. [L 1990, c 164, §2; am L 1996, c 312, §1; am L 1997, c 296,
§1; am L 1998, c 161, §1; am L 2013, c 227, §2]

§709-908 Tobacco products and electronic
smoking devices; persons under twenty-one years of age. [Section
effective January 1, 2016. For section effective until December 31, 2015, see
above.] (1) Effective January 1, 2016, it shall be unlawful to sell or
furnish a tobacco product in any shape or form or an electronic smoking device
to a person under twenty-one years of age.

(2) Effective January 1, 2016, signs using the
statement, "The sale of tobacco products or electronic smoking devices to
persons under twenty-one is prohibited", shall be posted on or near any
vending machine in letters at least one-half inch high and at or near the point
of sale of any other location where tobacco products or electronic smoking
devices are sold in letters at least one-half inch high.

(3) It shall be unlawful for a person under
twenty-one years of age to purchase any tobacco product or electronic smoking
device, as those terms are defined in subsection (5). This provision does not
apply if a person under the age of twenty-one, with parental authorization, is
participating in a controlled purchase as part of a law enforcement activity or
a study authorized by the department of health under the supervision of law
enforcement to determine the level of incidence of tobacco or electronic
smoking devices sales to persons under twenty-one years of age.

(4) Any person who violates subsection (1) or
(2), or both, shall be fined $500 for the first offense. Any subsequent
offenses shall subject the person to a fine not less than $500 nor more than
$2,000. Any person under twenty-one years of age who violates subsection (3)
shall be fined $10 for the first offense. Any subsequent offense shall subject
the violator to a fine of $50, no part of which shall be suspended, or the
person shall be required to perform not less than forty-eight hours nor more
than seventy-two hours of community service during hours when the person is not
employed and is not attending school.

(5) For the purposes of this section:

"Electronic smoking device" means any
electronic product that can be used to aerosolize and deliver nicotine or other
substances to the person inhaling from the device, including but not limited to
an electronic cigarette, electronic cigar, electronic cigarillo, or electronic
pipe, and any cartridge or other component of the device or related product.

"Tobacco product" means any product
made or derived from tobacco that contains nicotine or other substances and is
intended for human consumption or is likely to be consumed, whether smoked,
heated, chewed, absorbed, dissolved, inhaled, or ingested by other means.
"Tobacco product" includes but is not limited to a cigarette, cigar,
pipe tobacco, chewing tobacco, snuff, snus, or an electronic smoking device.
"Tobacco product" does not include drugs, devices, or combination
products approved for sale by the United States Food and Drug Administration,
as those terms are defined in the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act. [L
1990, c 164, §2; am L 1996, c 312, §1; am L 1997, c 296, §1; am L 1998, c 161,
§1; am L 2013, c 227, §2; am L 2015, c 122, §3]

COMMENTARY ON §709-908

Act 164, Session Laws 1990, added this section and repealed
similar provisions of §§445-211, 445-212, 445-212.5, and 445-213.

Act 312, Session Laws 1996, amended subsection (2) by
decreasing the height and capitalization requirements of the letters in the
signs that state that the sale of tobacco products to persons under eighteen is
prohibited, and by requiring that the signs be posted at or near the point of
sale where tobacco products are sold. The legislature found that the current
requirements for the signs resulted in signs that were often too large to be
posted in locations close to the point of sale. Changing the height and
capitalization requirements for the signs would mean that the signs could more
easily be posted at the point of sale, thereby enhancing the deterrence to the
illegal sales of tobacco products to minors. Conference Committee Report No.
24.

Act 296, Session Laws 1997, amended subsection (3) to exempt
minors, who with parental consent are participating in a controlled purchase of
tobacco products as part of a law enforcement activity or a study authorized by
the department of health to determine the level of incidence of tobacco sales
to minors, from the proscription against minors purchasing any tobacco
products. The legislature found that both nationally and within the State, one
of the most serious public health concerns was that of preventing the use of
tobacco by minors. The legislature further found that one of the more
successful methods of preventing the use of tobacco by minors was to monitor
sales of tobacco to ensure compliance with the statewide prohibition of sales
to minors. Senate Standing Committee Report No. 693, House Standing Committee
Report No. 1652.

Act 161, Session Laws 1998, amended this section by
increasing the fines for selling tobacco to minors or failing to post a sign on
any vending machine stating that the sale of tobacco products to persons under
eighteen is prohibited. The legislature found that the new fine schedule
imposed a more serious penalty that would help reduce the illegal sales of
tobacco to minors. The imposition of the increased fines should motivate
tobacco retailers to scrutinize the ages of their customers with greater care.
Conference Committee Report No. 91, Senate Standing Committee Report No. 3010.

Act 227, Session Laws 2013, amended this section by
prohibiting the sale of electronic smoking devices to minors and the purchase
of these items by minors, to reduce the number of minors and youth who smoke.
Conference Committee Report No. 124.

Act 122, Session Laws 2015, amended this section by: (1)
increasing the minimum age for persons who may purchase tobacco products or
electronic smoking devices from eighteen to twenty-one years of age; (2)
amending the definition of "electronic smoking device"; and (3)
defining the term "tobacco product." The legislature found that the
use of e-cigarettes is prevalent among adolescents in Hawaii. According to
recent figures from six Hawaii high schools, among the ninth and tenth grade
students, twenty-nine per cent have used e-cigarettes at least once and
eighteen per cent use them regularly. This sample's rate of e-cigarette use is
considerably higher than rates in current studies of adolescents in other areas
of the United States. Senate Standing Committee Report No. 767.

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next